Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1923
Quality assurance assessment; report;
medicaid cost report; how treated.

A nursing facility or skilled nursing
facility shall report the quality assurance assessment on a separate line
of the medicaid cost report of the nursing facility or skilled nursing facility.
The quality assurance assessment shall be treated as a separate component
in developing rates paid to nursing facilities or skilled nursing facilities
and shall not be included with existing rate components. In developing a rate
component for the quality assurance assessment, the assessment shall be treated
as a direct pass-through to each nursing facility and skilled nursing facility,
retroactive to July 1, 2011. The quality assurance assessment shall not be
subject to any cost limitation or revenue offset.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 23.